Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2603.01
Tribal stamp; authorized.

The state may
enter into an agreement with an Indian tribe pursuant to section 77-2602.06
which contemplates the use of a tribal stamp for sales of cigarettes on an
Indian tribe's Indian country in lieu of the cigarette stamp required under
section 77-2603.

Laws 2011, LB590, § 25.